dictsource/bn_rules
// Pronounciation rule for Bengali.
// Improvement input by Him Prasad Gautam (Nepal).
// This file is UTF8 encoded 

// letter groups:
// A   vowel letters and vowel signs
// B   vowel signs and virama ्
// C   consonants
// Y   vowel letters and vowel signs



.replace
 ০	0
 ১	1
 ২	2
 ৩	3
 ৪	4
 ৫	5
 ৬	6
 ৭	7
 ৮	8
 ৯	9


// Vowels


.group অ
       অ        V
       অঁ        O~
       অ্যা       &          // V,ja in [æmiba]
      

.group আ
       আ        a
       আঁ        a~

.group ই
        ই        i
        ইঁ        i~


.group ঈ
        ঈ        i
        ঈঁ        i~


.group উ
        উ        u
        উঁ        u~

        
.group ঊ
        ঊ        u
        ঊঁ        u~

.group ঋ
        ঋ        ri
        ঋঁ        ri~

.group ঌ
       ঌ         l-
       
       
.group এ
        এ        &
        এঁ        &~

        
.group ঐ
        ঐ        oj
        ঐঁ        o~j

        
.group এ
        এ        e
        এঁ        e~
        
        এ্যা       &    // e,ja  [ækademi]


.group ও
        ও        o
        ওঁ        o~

        
.group ঔ
        ঔ        ow
        ঔঁ        o~w

.group ও //??
        ও        o:


        

// Vowel Signs

.group া
	C) া	a
	C) াঁ	a~

.group ি
	C) ি	i
	C) িঁ	i~

.group ী
	C) ী	i
	C) ীঁ	i~

.group ূ
	C) ূ	u
	C) ূঁ	u~

.group ু
	C) ু	u
	C) ুঁ	u~

.group ৃ
	C) ৃ	r'i
	C) ৃঁ	r'i~

.group ে
	C) ে	e
	C) েঁ	e~
	C) েউ	ew

.group ৈ
	C) ৈ	oj
	C) ৈঁ	o~j

.group ো
	C) ো	o
	C) োঁ	o~

.group ৌ
	C) ৌ	ow
	C) ৌঁ	o~w
.group ৺
	৺(C	iSSor


       
// Consonants

.group ক
        ক        kV
        ক (B     k

        ক্ষ        k#k#V   // or [k#:] ?
        ক্ষ (B     k#k#


.group খ
        খ        k#V
        খ (B     k#
        
        
.group গ
        গ        gV
        গ (B     g


.group ঘ
        ঘ        g#V
        ঘ (B     g#

        
.group ঙ
        ঙ        NV
        ঙ (B     N


.group চ
        চ        tSV
        চ (B     tS


.group ছ
        ছ        tS#V
        ছ  (B    tS#

        
.group জ
        জ        JV
        জ (B     J
        
        জ্ব        JV
        জ্ব (B     J
        জ্ঞ        ggo~
        জ্ঞ (B     gg


.group ঝ
        ঝ        J#V
        ঝ (B     J#

        
.group ঞ
        ঞ        nV
        ঞ (B     n
 

.group ট
        ট         t.V
        ট (B      t.


.group ঠ
        ঠ        t.#V
        ঠ (B     t.#
       

.group ড
        ড        d.V
        ড (B     d.

        ড়        r.V     // nukta
        ড় (B     r.

        
.group ঢ
        ঢ        d.#V
        ঢ (B     d.#

        ঢ়        hr.V
        ঢ় (B     hr.
       
       
.group ণ
        ণ        nV   // should be [n.] if adjacent to t. or d. ?
        ণ (B     n



.group ত
        ত        tV
        ত (B     t
        ত (_     to

        
.group থ
        থ        t#V
        থ (B     t#


.group দ
        দ        dV
        দ (B     d


.group ধ
        ধ        d#V
        ধ (B     d#


.group ন
        ন        nV
        ন (B     n

        
.group প
        প        pV
        প (B     p

  
.group ফ
        ফ        fV    // or [p#] ?
        ফ (B     f
  

.group ব
        ব        bV
        ব (B     b

        
.group ভ
        ভ        b#V
        ভ (B     b#

        
.group ম
        ম        mV
        ম (B     m

        
.group য়
        য়       jV
     _) য় (B    j    
        য় (B        // used to separate 2 vowels
        য় (_    jo

        
.group য
        য       dZV
        য (B    dZ
        
        য়	jV   // nukta
     _) য় (B	j
        য় (B	

     ্) য (_   :O   // double the previous consonant
     ্) য (B_  :
        
     ্) য (C    &   //  ব্যস্ত  [bæsto]
     ্) যা      &    // ব্যাকরণ [bækɔron] 


.group র
        র        rV
        র (B     r

    
.group ল
        ল        lV
        ল  (B    l



.group শ
        শ        SV  // or [s] ?
        শ (B     S
        
        
        শ (্ল   s

        
.group ষ
        ষ        SV   
        ষ (B     S

     
.group স
        স        SV  // or [s] ??
        স (B     S
        
        স (্থ   s
        স (্ত   s
        
        স (্য    s  // সমস্যা
        
     _) স্ব        SV   // shb
     _) স্ব (B     S

        
.group হ
        হ        hV  
        হ (B     h
        হ (_     ho

        
.group হ্ব
        হ্ব       vV
        হ্ব (B    v

        
.group ৎ
        ৎ        t


.group ড়         // can be ড plus nukta
        ড়        r.V
        ড় (B     r.

       
.group ঢ়         // can be ঢ plus nukta
        ঢ়        hr.V
        ঢ় (B     hr.
        ঢ় (_     hr.o
        


.group ঁ
	C) ঁ	 O~     // candrabindu, nasalize the previous vowel/Consonants

.group ং
       A) ং        N     //  anusvara/onushshor
       C) ং        N     //  anusvara/onushshor
   
.group ঃ              // visarga/bishorgo
        ঃ             // doubles the following consonant
        ঃ (_      H

.group ্		// virama/hoshonto
     C) ্


.group ়
	়		// nukta, modifies a consonant



.group
       // obsolete letters
        ঋ        r-
        ৠ        r-
        ঌ        l-
        ৡ        l-
        ৃ        r-
        ৄ        r-
        ৢ        l-
        ৣ        l-

    __) - (_D    bij'og
    D_) - (_D    bij'og
